Maine, session 132, LD1388.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §2105, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 737, Pt. A, §2 and
Pt. C, §106 and amended by PL 1989, c. 6; c. 9, §2; and c. 104, Pt. C, §§8 and 10, is further
amended to read:
4. Effective date. If a majority more of the ballots votes cast on any question under
subsection 1 or 2 favor acceptance than oppose it, the new charter, charter revision, charter
modification or charter amendment proposed in that question becomes effective as
provided in this subsection, provided as long as the total number of votes cast for and
against in favor of the question equals or exceeds 30% 15% of the total votes cast in the
municipality at the last gubernatorial election.
A. Except as provided in subparagraph (1), new charters, charter revisions or charter
modifications adopted by the voters take effect on the first day of the next succeeding
municipal year.
(1) New charters, charter revisions or charter modifications take effect
immediately for the purpose of conducting any elections required by the new
provisions.
B. Charter amendments adopted by the voters take effect on the date determined by
the municipal officers, but not later than the first day of the next municipal year.